Illinois, session 104th, SB1329.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 521B-75 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/21B-75)7    Sec. 21B-75. Suspension or revocation of license, 8endorsement, or approval.9    (a) As used in this Section, "teacher" means any school 10district employee regularly required to be licensed, as 11provided in this Article, in order to teach or supervise in the 12public schools.13    (b) The State Superintendent of Education has the 14exclusive authority, in accordance with this Section and any 15rules adopted by the State Board of Education, in consultation 16with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, to 17initiate the suspension of up to 5 calendar years or 18revocation of any license, endorsement, or approval issued 19pursuant to this Article for abuse or neglect of a child, 20sexual misconduct as defined in subsection (c) of Section 2122-85.5 of this Code, immorality, a condition of health 22detrimental to the welfare of pupils, incompetency, 23unprofessional conduct (which includes the failure to disclose   SB1329 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06310 LNS 16345 b1on an employment application any previous conviction for a sex 2offense, as defined in Section 21B-80 of this Code, or any 3other offense committed in any other state or against the laws 4of the United States that, if committed in this State, would be 5punishable as a sex offense, as defined in Section 21B-80 of 6this Code), the neglect of any professional duty, willful or 7negligent failure to report an instance of suspected child 8abuse or neglect as required by the Abused and Neglected Child 9Reporting Act, or other just cause. Negligent failure to 10report an instance of suspected child abuse or neglect occurs 11when a teacher personally observes an instance of suspected 12child abuse or neglect and reasonably believes, in his or her 13professional or official capacity, that the instance 14constitutes an act of child abuse or neglect under the Abused 15and Neglected Child Reporting Act, and he or she, without 16willful intent, fails to immediately report or cause a report 17to be made of the suspected abuse or neglect to the Department 18of Children and Family Services, as required by the Abused and 19Neglected Child Reporting Act. Unprofessional conduct shall 20include the refusal to attend or participate in institutes, 21teachers' meetings, or professional readings or to meet other 22reasonable requirements of the regional superintendent of 23schools or State Superintendent of Education. Unprofessional 24conduct also includes conduct that violates the standards, 25ethics, or rules applicable to the security, administration, 26monitoring, or scoring of or the reporting of scores from any   SB1329 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06310 LNS 16345 b1assessment test or examination administered under Section 22-3.64a-5 of this Code or that is known or intended to produce 3or report manipulated or artificial, rather than actual, 4assessment or achievement results or gains from the 5administration of those tests or examinations. Unprofessional 6conduct shall also include neglect or unnecessary delay in the 7making of statistical and other reports required by school 8officers. Incompetency shall include, without limitation, 2 or 9more school terms of service for which the license holder has 10received an unsatisfactory rating on a performance evaluation 11conducted pursuant to Article 24A of this Code within a period 12of 7 school terms of service. In determining whether to 13initiate action against one or more licenses based on 14incompetency and the recommended sanction for such action, the 15State Superintendent shall consider factors that include 16without limitation all of the following:17        (1) Whether the unsatisfactory evaluation ratings 18    occurred prior to June 13, 2011 (the effective date of 19    Public Act 97-8).20        (2) Whether the unsatisfactory evaluation ratings 21    occurred prior to or after the implementation date, as 22    defined in Section 24A-2.5 of this Code, of an evaluation 23    system for teachers in a school district.24        (3) Whether the evaluator or evaluators who performed 25    an unsatisfactory evaluation met the pre-licensure and 26    training requirements set forth in Section 24A-3 of this   SB1329 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06310 LNS 16345 b1    Code.2        (4) The time between the unsatisfactory evaluation 3    ratings.4        (5) The quality of the remediation plans associated 5    with the unsatisfactory evaluation ratings and whether the 6    license holder successfully completed the remediation 7    plans.8        (6) Whether the unsatisfactory evaluation ratings were 9    related to the same or different assignments performed by 10    the license holder.11        (7) Whether one or more of the unsatisfactory 12    evaluation ratings occurred in the first year of a 13    teaching or administrative assignment. 14When initiating an action against one or more licenses, the 15State Superintendent may seek required professional 16development as a sanction in lieu of or in addition to 17suspension or revocation. Any such required professional 18development must be at the expense of the license holder, who 19may use, if available and applicable to the requirements 20established by administrative or court order, training, 21coursework, or other professional development funds in 22accordance with the terms of an applicable collective 23bargaining agreement entered into after June 13, 2011 (the 24effective date of Public Act 97-8), unless that agreement 25specifically precludes use of funds for such purpose. 26    (c) The State Superintendent of Education shall, upon   SB1329 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 06310 LNS 16345 b1receipt of evidence of abuse or neglect of a child, 2immorality, a condition of health detrimental to the welfare 3of pupils, incompetency (subject to subsection (b) of this 4Section), unprofessional conduct, the neglect of any 5professional duty, or other just cause, further investigate 6and, if and as appropriate, serve written notice to the 7individual and afford the individual opportunity for a hearing 8prior to suspension, revocation, or other sanction; provided 9that the State Superintendent is under no obligation to 10initiate such an investigation if the Department of Children 11and Family Services is investigating the same or substantially 12similar allegations and its child protective service unit has 13not made its determination, as required under Section 7.12 of 14the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act. If the State 15Superintendent of Education does not receive from an 16individual a request for a hearing within 10 days after the 17individual receives notice, the suspension, revocation, or 18other sanction shall immediately take effect in accordance 19with the notice. If a hearing is requested within 10 days after 20notice of an opportunity for hearing, it shall act as a stay of 21proceedings until the State Educator Preparation and Licensure 22Board issues a decision. Any hearing shall take place in the 23educational service region where the educator is or was last 24employed and in accordance with rules adopted by the State 25Board of Education, in consultation with the State Educator 26Preparation and Licensure Board, and such rules shall include   SB1329 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 06310 LNS 16345 b1without limitation provisions for discovery and the sharing of 2information between parties prior to the hearing. The standard 3of proof for any administrative hearing held pursuant to this 4Section shall be by the preponderance of the evidence. The 5decision of the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board 6is a final administrative decision and is subject to judicial 7review by appeal of either party.8    The State Board of Education may refuse to issue or may 9suspend the license of any person who fails to file a return or 10to pay the tax, penalty, or interest shown in a filed return or 11to pay any final assessment of tax, penalty, or interest, as 12required by any tax Act administered by the Department of 13Revenue, until such time as the requirements of any such tax 14Act are satisfied.15    The exclusive authority of the State Superintendent of 16Education to initiate suspension or revocation of a license 17pursuant to this Section does not preclude a regional 18superintendent of schools from cooperating with the State 19Superintendent or a State's Attorney with respect to an 20investigation of alleged misconduct.21    (d) The State Superintendent of Education or his or her 22designee may initiate and conduct such investigations as may 23be reasonably necessary to establish the existence of any 24alleged misconduct. At any stage of the investigation, the 25State Superintendent may issue a subpoena requiring the 26attendance and testimony of a witness, including the license   SB1329 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 06310 LNS 16345 b1holder, and the production of any evidence, including files, 2records, correspondence, or documents, relating to any matter 3in question in the investigation. The subpoena shall require a 4witness to appear at the State Board of Education at a 5specified date and time and shall specify any evidence to be 6produced. The license holder is not entitled to be present, 7but the State Superintendent shall provide the license holder 8with a copy of any recorded testimony prior to a hearing under 9this Section. Such recorded testimony must not be used as 10evidence at a hearing, unless the license holder has adequate 11notice of the testimony and the opportunity to cross-examine 12the witness. Failure of a license holder to comply with a duly 13issued, investigatory subpoena may be grounds for revocation, 14suspension, or denial of a license.15    (e) All correspondence, documentation, and other 16information so received by the regional superintendent of 17schools, the State Superintendent of Education, the State 18Board of Education, or the State Educator Preparation and 19Licensure Board under this Section is confidential and must 20not be disclosed to third parties, except (i) as necessary for 21the State Superintendent of Education or his or her designee 22to investigate and prosecute pursuant to this Article, (ii) 23pursuant to a court order, (iii) for disclosure to the license 24holder or his or her representative, or (iv) as otherwise 25required in this Article and provided that any such 26information admitted into evidence in a hearing is exempt from   SB1329 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 06310 LNS 16345 b1this confidentiality and non-disclosure requirement. 2    (e-5) The State Superintendent of Education or his or her 3designee may notify a license holder's current or most recent 4employer, if the employer is a public school or school 5district, charter school, special education cooperative, 6nonpublic school, nonpublic special education facility, or 7public school residential facility, that the license holder is 8being investigated for an alleged act of misconduct that 9constitutes a threat to the safety of students, including 10serious physical injury, sexual misconduct as defined in 11subsection (c) of Section 22-85.5 of this Code, or a sex or 12other offense as defined in Section 21B-80 of this Code. 13    (f) The State Superintendent of Education or a person 14designated by him or her shall have the power to administer 15oaths to witnesses at any hearing conducted before the State 16Educator Preparation and Licensure Board pursuant to this 17Section. The State Superintendent of Education or a person 18designated by him or her is authorized to subpoena and bring 19before the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board any 20person in this State and to take testimony either orally or by 21deposition or by exhibit, with the same fees and mileage and in 22the same manner as prescribed by law in judicial proceedings 23in civil cases in circuit courts of this State.24    (g) Any circuit court, upon the application of the State 25Superintendent of Education or the license holder, may, by 26order duly entered, require the attendance of witnesses and   SB1329 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 06310 LNS 16345 b1the production of relevant books and papers as part of any 2investigation or at any hearing the State Educator Preparation 3and Licensure Board is authorized to conduct pursuant to this 4Section, and the court may compel obedience to its orders by 5proceedings for contempt.6    (h) The State Board of Education shall receive an annual 7line item appropriation to cover fees associated with the 8investigation and prosecution of alleged educator misconduct 9and hearings related thereto.10(Source: P.A. 101-531, eff. 8-23-19; 102-552, eff. 1-1-22; 11102-702, eff. 7-1-23.)